Massachusetts, session 194th, S1598.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or general law there shall be a special commission to study
the feasibility and best practices for a statewide education and awareness program to prevent the
contraction of Lyme disease and tick borne illnesses.
The special commission shall consist of: the secretary of health and human services, or
their designee; the commissioner of the department of public health, or their designee; a
representative from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; two members of the House
of Representatives, one of whom to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and the other to be appointed by the minority leader; two members of the
Senate, one of whom to be appointed by the President of the Senate, and the other to be
of 2

appointed by the minority leader; one member who has been diagnosed with Lyme Disease;
provided, however, that the first meeting of the commission shall take place not later than
December 1, 2025.
The special commission shall submit its recommendations, together with drafts of any
legislation, to the clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate, the chairs of the joint
committee on mental health and substance abuse not later than July 1, 2026.
of 2